Vermont statutes. Title 19 Highways
Subchapter 2. Repairs with Other Towns

§ 910.
Union of towns for highway improvements.

Two or more municipalities, by vote of their respective boards of aldermen and selectboards, may unite for the purpose of improving or repairing any portion of a highway passing into or through each of them.
When a union has been effected, the officials of the respective municipalities shall constitute a joint committee that shall be the agent of the several municipalities and may appoint one person to supervise the actual work.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 911.
Apportionment of expense.

The expenses incurred may be apportioned as agreed upon by the committee before the work is begun.
Each board named may accept donations for the work. A town or city shall not spend more than one percent of its grand list in any one year, unless a larger sum has been voted at a regular or special meeting warned for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.